Georgia, session 2025_26, SB363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 21-2-216 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to qualifications
of electors generally, reregistration of electors purged from list, eligibility of nonresidents
who vote in presidential elections, retention of qualification for standing as elector, evidence
of citizenship, and check of convicted felons and deceased persons databases, is amended by
revising subsection (b) as follows:
"(b) In addition to the qualifications in subsection (a) of this Code section, no person who
has been convicted of a felony involving moral turpitude may register, remain registered,
S. B. 363
- 1 -

LC 48 1387
or vote except upon completion of the sentence and no person who has been judicially
determined to be mentally incompetent may register, remain registered, or vote unless the
disability has been removed."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, only if an amendment to the
Constitution of Georgia is ratified at the November, 2026, general election removing a
conviction of a felony involving moral turpitude as an exception to the right to register and
vote. If such an amendment to the Constitution is not so ratified, this Act shall not become
effective and shall stand repealed by operation of law on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 363
- 2 -